Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3255
Improvement projects; apportionment of benefits; appeal.

From any order or decision of the board of directors of the natural resources district, an appeal may be taken to the district court by any person aggrieved by filing an undertaking in the sum of two hundred dollars with such sureties as may be approved by the clerk of the district court. Such undertaking shall be conditioned that the appellant will prosecute such appeal without delay and will pay all costs adjudged against him in the district court. Such undertaking shall be executed to the board of directors of the natural resources district and may be sued on in the name of the obligee. Where the project area is confined to the limits of one county, the appeal shall be taken to the district court of that county. When such project includes lands in two or more counties, the appeal shall be taken to the district court of the county in which the largest portion of the land which is claimed to be affected adversely by the order or decision appealed from lies. The appeal must be taken within thirty days after such decision or order has been entered by the secretary of the board of directors.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 55, p. 133.

The provisions of this section are a mechanism for appeal solely from decisions or orders of a board of directors of a natural resources district regarding special improvement projects and are not applicable to decisions of the board that do not arise in the context of special improvement projects. Japp v. Papio-Missouri River NRD, 271 Neb. 968, 716 N.W.2d 707 (2006).